Illinois, session 104th, HB5405.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 5Marriage Act is amended by adding Section 602.12 as follows: 6    (750 ILCS 5/602.12 new)7    Sec. 602.12. Petition to terminate parental rights.8(a) In a proceeding for dissolution of marriage, legal 9separation, declaration of invalidity of marriage, or any 10proceeding in which parental responsibilities are allocated 11under this Act or in a proceeding under the Illinois Parentage 12Act of 2015, a parent may file a petition to terminate the 13parental rights of the other parent.14(b) The court may terminate parental rights if the petitioning 15parent proves by clear and convincing evidence that the 16respondent parent has: 17        (1) abandoned the child; or18        (2) engaged in a prolonged failure, without good 19    cause, to provide reasonable financial support for or to 20    maintain meaningful contact or visitation with the child, 21    although able to do so. 22    (c) The burden of proof is on the petitioning parent. The 23grounds set forth in subsection (b) must be established by   HB5405- 2 -LRB104 20205 JRC 33656 b1clear and convincing evidence.2    (d) Best interests of the child. A finding of grounds 3under subsection (b) does not require termination. The court 4shall also determine whether termination of parental rights is 5in the best interests of the child. In making this 6determination, the court shall consider the factors set forth 7subsection (b) of Section 602.7 of this Act together with any 8other relevant factors.9    (e) The court may not order termination under this Section 10if it finds that the failure to support or maintain contact or 11visitation was due to: 12        (1) interference or obstruction by the petitioning 13    parent;14        (2) a court-ordered limitation, restriction, or 15    suspension of parenting time; or16        (3) other good cause beyond the respondent parent's 17    control. 18    (f) An order terminating parental rights under this 19Section: 20        (1) severs all legal rights, privileges, duties, and 21    obligations of the terminated parent with respect to the 22    child; and23        (2) does not extinguish any child support arrearages 24    accrued before termination, unless expressly ordered by 25    the court.